District of Columbia statutes.
6-905

Owner to repair or demolish condemned building.

The owner of any building or part of building condemned under the provisions of this chapter shall, within the time specified by the Board for the Condemnation of Insanitary Buildings in the order of condemnation, or any extension of time which may be granted by the Board:

(1)

make such changes or repairs as will remedy the conditions which led to the condemnation of such building or part of building; or

(2)

cause such building or part of building to be demolished and removed;

provided, that any owner repairing a building or part of building in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be required to make only those repairs which are reasonably related to a correction of the uninhabitable or insanitary condition or conditions found by said Board to exist in or about said building, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the Board to require any repair not reasonably related to the correction of any uninhabitable or insanitary condition in or about such building, but the Board may require the building to be brought into substantial conformity with the Building Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986. Whenever any building is repaired or demolished in accordance with the requirements of this section, such repair or demolition shall be performed in such manner and under the authority of such permit as may be required by any applicable law or regulation.

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 158, ch. 2073, § 5
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 886, ch. 1032
Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 13(f), 34 DCR 1072
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 103(d), 48 DCR 1888

History

This section is referenced in § 6-916.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 5-705.
1973 Ed., § 5-620.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-281 substituted “uninhabitable or insanitary condition” for “insanitary condition” in two places, and substituted “but the Board may require the building to be brought into substantial conformity” for “or to require such building to be brought into substantial conformity”.

Effect of Amendments

The “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986,” referred to in par. (2), is D.C. Law 6-216.

References in Text